Mississippi, session 2026, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-1.  Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-53 may be referred to as the "Housing Authorities Law," and the following terms, whenever used or referred to in * * *said such sections, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context: (a)  "Authority" or "housing authority" shall mean any of the public corporations created by or pursuant to this Housing Authorities Law, or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto, with power to undertake housing projects for the persons of low income. (b)  "City" shall mean any city in this state. "County" shall mean any county in this state. "The city" shall mean the particular city for which a particular housing authority is created. "The county" shall mean the particular county for which a particular housing authority is created. (c)  "State public body" shall mean any city, town, village, county, municipal corporation, commission, district, authority, or other subdivision or other public body of this state. (d)  "Governing body" shall mean, in the case of a city, the board of aldermen, commissioners, or council; in the case of a county, the board of supervisors; and in the case of any other state public body, the board of aldermen, council, commissioners, board or other body having charge of the fiscal affairs of such state public body. (e)  "Mayor" shall mean the mayor of the city or the officer thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor or executive head of the city. (f)  "Clerk" shall mean the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county, as the case may be, or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on such clerk. (g)  "Area of operation," in the case of a housing authority of a city, shall include such city and the area within five (5) miles of the territorial boundaries thereof. (h)  "Federal government" shall include the United States of America, the United States Housing Authority, or any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America. (i)  "Slum" shall mean any area where dwellings predominate which, by reason of dilapidation, overcrowding, faulty arrangement, or design, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or any combination of these factors, are detrimental to safety, health or morals. (j)  "Housing project" shall mean any work or undertaking: (1) to demolish, clear or remove buildings from any slum area; such work or undertaking may embrace the adoption of such area to public purposes, including parks or other recreational or community purposes; or (2) to provide decent, safe and sanitary urban or rural dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations for persons of low income; such work or undertaking may include buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water service, parks, site preparation, gardening, administrative, community, health, recreational, welfare or other purposes; or (3) to accomplish a combination of the aforegoing. The term "housing project" also may be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements and all other work in connection therewith. (k)  "Mixed-finance project" means a project that is financially assisted by private resources, which may include low-income housing tax credits, in addition to an amount provided under any state or federal program.  "Mixed-finance project" includes a project that is developed by: (i)  An authority or by an entity affiliated with an authority; (ii)  A partnership, a limited liability company, or other entity in which the authority, or an entity affiliated with an authority, is a general partner, managing member, or otherwise participates in the activities of the entity; or (iii)  Any entity that grants to the authority the right of first refusal and first option to purchase, after the close of the compliance period, the qualified low-income building in which the public housing units exist in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Section 42(i)(7) (26 USC Section 42(i)(7)); ( * * *kl)  "Persons of low income" shall mean persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary (as determined by the authority undertaking the housing project) to enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. ( * * *lm)  "Bonds" shall mean any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued by a housing authority. ( * * *mn)  "Real property" shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise and the indebtedness secured by such liens. ( * * *no)  "Obligee of the authority" or "obligee" shall include any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a housing project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the authority. SECTION 2.  Section 43-33-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-11.  An authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental functions, and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted: (a)  To sue and to be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; and to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this article, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority. (b)  Within its area of operation:  to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease and operate housing projects; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof by direct sponsorship of the authority, by the purchase of a mortgage or by the making of a mortgage loan to a not-for-profit entity or corporation. (c)  To own, operate, assist, or otherwise participate in one or more mixed-finance projects to provide for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration or repair of any housing project or any part thereof.  An authority may provide capital assistance, operating assistance and financing assistance to a mixed-finance project in the form of a grant, loan, guaranty, collateralization or other form of investment in the project, or other form of public or private borrowings, for the construction or rehabilitation of a housing project. ( * * *cd)  To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works or facilities for, or in connection with, a housing project or the occupants thereof; and (notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this article or in any other provision of law) to include in any contract let in connection with a project, stipulations requiring that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the project. ( * * *de)  To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any housing project and (subject to the limitations contained in this article) to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor; to own, hold and improve real or personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise or otherwise any real or personal property or any interest therein; to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property; to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the authority against any risks or hazards; to procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guarantees from the federal government of the payment of any bonds or parts thereof issued by an authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance. (f)  When one or more authorities have formed partnerships, limited liability companies, or other entities in which an authority, or an entity affiliated with an authority, is a general partner, managing member, or otherwise participates in the activities of the entity for the sake of undertaking a mixed-finance project, the housing authority related entities may form a self-insurance pooling arrangement under Section 11-46-17.  Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, such housing authority-related entities may enter into an agreement or agreements with each other for joint or cooperative action to pool their financial and administrative resources for the purpose of providing to the participating housing authority-related entities risk management, insurance, reinsurance, self-insurance, or any combination thereof for any and all of the areas of liability or insurability, or both, for such housing authority-related entities. ( * * *eg)  To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled. ( * * *fh)  Within its area of operation:  to investigate into living, dwelling and housing conditions and into the means and methods of improving such conditions; to determine where slum areas exist or where there is a shortage of decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income; to make studies and recommendations relating to the problem of clearing, replanning and reconstructing of slum areas, and the problem of providing dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and to cooperate with the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof in action taken in connection with such problems; and to engage in research, studies and experimentation on the subject of housing. ( * * *gi)  Acting through one or more commissioners or other person or persons designated by the authority:  to conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material to its information; to administer oaths, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are outside of the state or unable to attend before the authority, or excused from attendance; to make available to appropriate agencies (including those charged with the duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions, or of demolishing unsafe or unsanitary structures within its area of operation) its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety or welfare. ( * * *hj)  To make payments to public bodies in the state in such amounts as it finds desirable, notwithstanding any statutory limitation on the amount of such payments. ( * * *ik)  To establish and operate a nonprofit corporation for housing and community development purposes. * * *(jl)  To exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted. No provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the Legislature shall specifically so state. SECTION 3.  Section 43-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-33-17.  Any two (2) or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise, either jointly or otherwise, of any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing (including the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations and giving security therefor), planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects or a mixed-finance project located within the area of operation of any one * * * (1) or more of * * *said the authorities.  For such purpose an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities, so joining or cooperating with it, to act on its behalf with respect to any or all of such powers.  Any authorities joining or cooperating with one another may by resolutions appoint from among the commissioners of such authorities an executive committee with full power to act on behalf of such authorities with respect to any or all of their powers, as prescribed by resolutions of such authorities. SECTION 4.  The following shall be codified as Section 43-33-52, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-33-52.  The individual commissioners, directors, supervisory employees, and supervisory agents of a housing authority, whether such housing authority is formed under this chapter or by private act, while acting in the scope of their authority, including those entities that a housing authority or entity affiliated with a housing authority may form, incorporate or join as a partner or member to develop or manage a mixed-finance project, and the directors, supervisory employees, and supervisory agents of such entities, while acting in the scope of their authority for the development or management of the mixed-finance project, enjoy the same protections and immunities that are presently provided for housing authority corporations under the law of this state, and any protections and immunities that may be provided to housing authorities in the future under the law of this state. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.